North Carolina, session 2025, HB390.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 2 of Article 5 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-78.4. Hospital standards for surgical smoke evacuation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Smoke evacuation/filtering system. – Stand-alone, portable equipment that
effectively captures, filters, and eliminates surgical smoke at the site of origin
before the smoke makes contact with the eyes or respiratory tracts of
occupants in the room. This equipment is not required to be interconnected to
the hospital surgical ventilation or medical gas system.
(2) Surgical smoke. – The gaseous by-product produced by energy-generating
devices, including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-generated
airborne contaminants, or lung-damaging dust.
(b) Each hospital licensed under this Part shall adopt and implement policies that require
the use of a smoke evacuation/filtering system during any surgical procedure that is likely to
generate surgical smoke.
(c) Adverse Action. – The Department of Health and Human Services may take adverse
action against a hospital under G.S. 131E-78 for a violation of this section."
SECTION 2. Part 4 of Article 6 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-147.2. Ambulatory surgical facility standards for surgical smoke evacuation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Smoke evacuation/filtering system. – Equipment that effectively captures,
filters, and eliminates surgical smoke at the site of origin before the smoke
makes contact with the eyes or the respiratory tracts of occupants in the room.
This equipment is not required to be interconnected to the ambulatory surgical
ventilation or medical gas system.
(2) Surgical smoke. – The gaseous by-product produced by energy-generating
devices, including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-generated
airborne contaminants, or lung-damaging dust.
*H390-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Each ambulatory surgical facility licensed under this Part shall adopt and implement
policies that require the use of a smoke evacuation/filtering system during any surgical procedure
that is likely to generate surgical smoke.
(c) Adverse Action. – The Department of Health and Human Services may take adverse
action against an ambulatory surgical facility under G.S. 131E-148 for a violation of this section."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 390-First Edition